California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a civil penalty assessed shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation. Each day of a continuing violation is a separate violation. If the violation consists of engaging in a communication that is prohibited by the ex parte communication requirements, each day that the violation is not disclosed to the commission and to parties of record in the formal proceeding in which the communication occurred shall constitute a separate violation.

(2) If the entity or person may obtain, by violating the ex parte communication requirements, financial benefits that exceed the maximum amount of civil penalty allowable pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission may impose a civil penalty up to the amount of those financial benefits.

(c) Civil penalties assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) upon entities whose rates are determined by the commission shall be in the form of credits to the customers of that entity. Civil penalties collected from other entities shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(d) In determining the appropriate civil sanctions, the commission shall consider the following factors:

(1) The severity of the violation.

(2) The conduct of the entity or person, including the level of experience of the entity or person in participating in commission proceedings and whether the entity or person knowingly violated the ex parte communication requirements.

(3) The financial resources of the entity or person.

(4) The totality of the circumstances in furtherance of the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 807, Sec. 7.   (SB 215)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.7.

(a) The Attorney General may bring an enforcement action in superior court against a decisionmaker or employee of the commission who knowingly and willfully violates, fails to comply with, or procures, aids or abets any violation of, the ex parte communication requirements in this article or those adopted by the commission pursuant to this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1759, in an enforcement action brought pursuant to this section, the court may grant appropriate relief, including disqualification of the decisionmaker from one or more proceedings and civil penalties as provided in Section 2111.

(c) In determining the appropriate relief, the court may consider the following factors:

(1) The severity of the violation.

(2) The conduct of the decisionmaker or employee.

(3) The financial resources of the decisionmaker or employee.

(4) The totality of the circumstances in furtherance of the public interest.

(d) The Attorney General may compromise the enforcement action subject to approval by the court.

(e) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Litigation Deposits Fund established
 pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 16425) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 807, Sec. 8.   (SB 215)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Covered wildfire” means any wildfire ignited on or after July 12, 2019, for which either of the following is satisfied:

(A) The governmental agency responsible for determining causation or a court of competent jurisdiction determines the wildfire was caused by an electrical corporation.

(B) Asserted to have been caused by an electrical corporation and results in a court-approved dismissal resulting from the settlement of third-party damage claims.

(2) “Wildfire Fund” means the Wildfire Fund created
 pursuant to Section 3284.

(b) The following procedures and standards apply to a catastrophic wildfire proceeding:

(1) (A) An electrical corporation may file an application pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, as applicable, at any time after it has paid, or entered into binding commitments to pay, all or, if authorized by the commission for good cause, substantially all third-party damage claims, including payments made pursuant to judgments or settlement agreements related to a covered wildfire. Except as authorized by the commission for good cause, before filing the application, the electrical corporation shall exhaust all rights to indemnification or other claims, contractual or otherwise, against any third parties, including collecting insurance proceeds, related to the covered wildfire.

(B) If
 an electrical corporation has received payments from the Wildfire Fund for a third-party damage claim for the covered wildfire, the electrical corporation shall file an application to recover the costs pursuant to subparagraph (A) no later than the earlier of the following:

(i) The date when it has resolved all third-party damage claims and exhausted all right to indemnification or other claims, contractual or otherwise, against any third parties, including collecting insurance proceeds, related to the covered wildfire.

(ii) The date that is 45 days after the date the administrator requests the electrical corporation to file the application.

(C) If an electrical corporation issues recovery bonds authorized pursuant to a financing order issued pursuant to
 clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 850.1, the electrical corporation shall file an application pursuant to subparagraph (A) for a determination of the just and reasonableness of the costs and expenses included in the recovery bonds no later than the earlier of the following:

(i) The date when the electrical corporation has resolved all third-party damage claims and exhausted all rights to indemnification or other claims, contractual or otherwise, against any third parties, including collecting insurance proceeds, related to the covered wildfire.

(ii) The date that is 45 days after the date the commission requests the electrical corporation to file the application.

(2) The president of the commission, upon the initiation of a
 catastrophic wildfire proceeding by the filing of an application pursuant to paragraph (1), shall assign a commissioner to act as the presiding officer in the proceeding and an administrative law judge to assist in conducting the proceeding.

(3) Within 15 days of the filing date of the application, the commission shall notice a prehearing conference, which shall be held within 25 days of the filing date.

(4) (A) Within 30 days of the filing date of the application, the assigned commissioner shall prepare and issue, by order or ruling, a scoping memorandum that states that the scope of the proceeding shall be whether the electrical corporation’s costs and expenses for the covered wildfire are just and reasonable pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, as applicable.

(B) The scoping memorandum shall
 establish a schedule for the proceeding, including the date of issuance of a proposed decision that is no later than 12 months after the filing date of the application.

(C) The assigned commissioner may extend the time established in the scoping memorandum for the date of issuance of a proposed decision by up to six months upon a showing of good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 81, Sec. 4.   (SB 168)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1701.9.

The following provisions apply during the pendency of a commission proceeding, except these provisions do not apply during an adjudicatory or quasi-legislative proceeding:

(a) The commission may meet in closed session to deliberate on a proposed decision, order, or resolution after providing three-day advance notice to the public.

(b) The commission shall establish a quiet period during the three business days before the commission’s scheduled vote on a decision, during which oral ex parte communications shall not be permitted.

(c) The requirement specified in subparagraph (F) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 11123 of the Government Code shall not apply to a meeting of the commission during a quiet period that is held by teleconference.

(d) (1) If the commission materially modifies a proposed decision during the first two business days of the three-day quiet period before the commission’s scheduled vote on the proposed decision, an interested person may submit a written ex parte communication during those two business days if copies of the written ex parte communication are concurrently transmitted to all parties at the same time as the written ex parte communication is submitted to the commission and the scope of the written ex parte communication is limited to the portion of the proposed decision that was materially modified.

(2) If the commission materially modifies a proposed decision during the last business day of the three-day quiet period before the commission’s scheduled vote on the proposed decision, an interested person may submit a written ex parte communication on that day if copies of the written ex parte communication are concurrently transmitted to all parties at the same time as the written ex parte communication is submitted to the commission and the scope of the written ex parte communication is limited to the portion of the proposed decision that was materially modified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 826, Sec. 2.   (AB 1068)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.

Complaint may be made by the commission of its own motion or by any corporation or person, chamber of commerce, board of trade, labor organization, or any civic, commercial, mercantile, traffic, agricultural, or manufacturing association or organization, or any body politic or municipal corporation, by written petition or complaint, setting forth any act or thing done or omitted to be done by any public utility, including any rule or charge heretofore established or fixed by or for any public utility, in violation or claimed to be in violation, of any provision of law or of any order or rule of the commission. No complaint shall be entertained by the commission, except upon its own motion, as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges of any gas, electrical, water, or telephone corporation, unless it is signed by the mayor or the president or chairman of the board of trustees or a majority of the council, commission, or other legislative body of the city or city and county within which the alleged violation occurred, or by not less than 25 actual or prospective consumers or purchasers of such gas, electricity, water, or telephone service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.1.

(a) The commission shall entertain complaints against any electrical, gas, water, heat, or telephone company under Sections 734, 735, and 736 when the amount of money claimed does not exceed the jurisdictional limit of the small claims court as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 116.220 or Section 116.221 of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, when the public interest so requires, the commission or presiding officer may, at any time prior to the filing of a decision, terminate the expedited complaint procedure and recalendar the matter for hearing under the commission’s regular procedure.

(b) No attorney at law shall represent any party other than himself or herself under the expedited complaint procedure.

(c) No pleading other than the complaint and answer is necessary. A hearing without a reporter shall be held within 30 days after the answer is filed.

(d) The parties may file applications for rehearing pursuant to Section 1731. If the commission grants an application for rehearing, the rehearing shall be conducted under the commission’s regular hearing procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 167, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any funds entrusted to the commission by any person or corporation filing a complaint against a public utility shall be deposited in trust by the commission in the custody of the Treasurer, as specified in Section 16305.3 of the Government Code.

(b) If the amount of the funds entrusted to the commission by a person or corporation filing a complaint against a public utility exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the commission may deposit the funds in trust in an insured account with a bank or a federal or state savings and loan association, bearing interest at rates up to the maximum permitted by law. The commission shall pay these funds, together with the interest paid thereon, to the party specified in the commission’s order or decision on that complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 748, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1702.5.

(a) The commission shall, in an existing or new proceeding, develop and implement a safety enforcement program applicable to gas corporations and electrical corporations which includes procedures for monitoring, data tracking and analysis, and investigations, as well as issuance of citations by commission staff, under the direction of the executive director. The enforcement program shall be designed to improve gas and electrical system safety through the enforcement of applicable law, or order or rule of the commission related to safety using a variety of enforcement mechanisms, including the issuance of corrective actions,
 orders, and citations by designated commission staff, and recommendations for action made to the commission by designated commission staff.

(1) When considering the issuance of citations and assessment of penalties, the commission staff shall take into account voluntary reporting of potential violations, voluntary removal or resolution efforts undertaken, the prior history of violations, the gravity of the violation, and the degree of culpability.

(2) The procedures shall include, but are not limited to, providing notice of violation within a reasonable period of time after the discovery of the violation.

(3) The commission shall adopt an administrative limit on the amount of monetary penalty that may be set by commission staff.

(b) The commission shall develop and implement an appeals process to govern the issuance and appeal of citations or resolution of corrective action orders issued by the commission staff. The appeals process shall provide the respondent a reasonable period of time, upon receiving a citation, to file a notice of appeal, shall afford an opportunity for a hearing, and shall require the hearing officer to expeditiously provide a draft disposition.

(c) The commission shall, within a reasonable time set by the commission, conclude a safety enforcement action
 with a finding of violation, a corrective action order, a citation, a determination of no violation, approval of the corrective actions undertaken by the gas corporation or electrical corporation, or other action. The commission may institute a formal proceeding regarding the alleged violation, potentially resulting in additional enforcement action, regardless of any enforcement action taken at the commission staff level.

(d) The commission shall implement the safety enforcement program for gas safety by July 1, 2014, and implement the safety enforcement program for electrical safety no later than January 1, 2015.

(e) This section does not apply to an exempt wholesale generator, a qualifying small power producer, or qualifying cogenerator, as defined in Section 796 of Title 16 of the United States Code and the regulations enacted pursuant thereto. Nothing in this section affects the commission’s authority pursuant to Section 761.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

All matters upon which complaint may be founded may be joined in one hearing, and no motion shall be entertained against a complaint for misjoinder of causes of action or grievances or misjoinder or nonjoinder of parties. In any review by the courts of orders or decisions of the commission the same rule shall apply with regard to the joinder of causes and parties as herein provided. The commission shall not be required to dismiss any complaint because of the absence of direct damage to the complainant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.

Upon the filing of a complaint, the commission shall cause a copy thereof to be served upon the corporation or person complained of. Service in all hearings, investigations, and proceedings pending before the commission may be made upon any person upon whom a summons may be served in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure, and may be made personally or by mailing in a sealed envelope, registered, with postage prepaid. The commission shall fix the time when and place where a hearing will be had upon the complaint and shall serve notice thereof, not less than 10 days before the time set for such hearing, unless the commission finds that public necessity requires that such hearing be held at an earlier date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the commission or a commissioner, or the time to which the hearing has been continued, the complainant and the corporation or person complained of, and such corporations or persons as the commission allows to intervene, shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence. The commission shall issue process to enforce the attendance of all necessary witnesses. After the conclusion of the hearing, the commission shall make and file its order, containing its decision. Except for decisions filed after hearings held under Section 1702.1, the decision shall contain, separately stated, findings of fact and conclusions of law by the commission on all issues material to the order or decision. A copy of such order, certified under the seal of the commission, shall be served upon the corporation or person complained of, or his or its attorney. The order shall, of its own force, take effect and become operative 20 days after the service thereof except as otherwise provided by the commission, and shall continue in force either for a period designated in it or until changed or abrogated by the commission. If the commission believes that an order cannot be complied with within 20 days, it may prescribe such additional time as in its judgment is reasonably necessary to comply with the order, and may on application and for good cause shown, extend the time for compliance fixed in its order. Decisions rendered in response to complaints filed and processed pursuant to Section 1702.1 shall not be considered as precedent or binding on the commission or the courts of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1091.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.

A complete record of all proceedings and testimony before the commission or any commissioner on any formal hearing shall be taken down by a reporter appointed by the commission, and the parties shall be entitled to be heard in person or by attorney. In case of an action to review any order or decision of the commission, a transcript of that testimony, together with all exhibits or copies thereof introduced, and of the pleadings, record, and proceedings in the cause, shall constitute the record of the commission, but if the petitioner and the commission stipulate that certain questions alone and a specified portion only of the evidence shall be certified to the Supreme Court or the court of appeal for its judgment, the stipulation and the questions and the evidence therein specified shall constitute the record on review. The provisions of this section shall not apply to hearings held pursuant to Section 1702.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 886, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1707.

Any public utility may complain on any of the grounds upon which complaints are allowed to be filed by other parties, and the same procedure shall be adopted and followed as in other cases, except that the complaint may be heard ex parte by the commission or may be served upon any parties designated by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1708.

The commission may at any time, upon notice to the parties, and with opportunity to be heard as provided in the case of complaints, rescind, alter, or amend any order or decision made by it. Any order rescinding, altering, or amending a prior order or decision shall, when served upon the parties, have the same effect as an original order or decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 514.)
-------------------------------------------

1708.5.

(a) The commission shall permit interested persons to petition the commission to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation.

(b) (1) The commission shall consider a petition and, within six months from the date of receipt of the petition, either deny the petition or institute a proceeding to adopt, amend, or repeal the regulation.

(2) The commission may extend the six month period for consideration of a petition pursuant to paragraph (1) to allow public review and comment pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 311.

(c) If the commission denies a petition, the order or resolution of the commission shall include a statement of the reasons of the commission for that denial.

(d) If the commission finds that it is precluded by law from granting a petition, the statement of reasons for denial pursuant to subdivision (c) shall identify the relevant provisions of law.

(e) The commission shall implement this section under the Rules of Practice and Procedure in effect on January 1, 2000. On or before July 1, 2001, the commission shall amend the Rules of Practice and Procedure to provide more specific procedures for handling a petition pursuant to this section.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1708, the commission may conduct any proceeding to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation using notice and comment rulemaking procedures, without an evidentiary hearing, except with respect to a regulation being amended or repealed that was adopted after an evidentiary hearing, in which case the parties to the original proceeding shall retain any right to an evidentiary hearing accorded by Section 1708.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1709.

In all collateral actions or proceedings, the orders and decisions of the commission which have become final shall be conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1710.

No documents or records of a public utility or person or corporation which purport to be statements of fact shall be admitted into evidence or shall serve as any basis for the testimony of any witness, unless the documents or records have been certified under penalty of perjury by the person preparing or in charge of preparing them as being true and correct. If the person preparing them is dead or has been declared incompetent, any other person having knowledge of such statements of fact may certify the records. If certification pursuant to this section is not possible for any reason, the documents or records shall not be admitted into evidence unless admissible under the Evidence Code.

This section shall not apply to any documents not prepared, directly or indirectly, by, or under the supervision or direction of, the public utility or person or corporation offering the documents into evidence.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2115 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1711.

(a) Where feasible and appropriate, except for adjudication cases, before determining the scope of the proceeding, the commission shall seek the participation of those who are likely to be affected, including those who are likely to benefit from, and those who are potentially subject to, a decision in that proceeding. The commission shall demonstrate its efforts to comply with this section in the text of the initial scoping memo of the proceeding.

(b) (1) The Policy and Planning Division of the commission shall undertake one or more studies of outreach efforts undertaken by other state and federal utility regulatory bodies and make recommendations
 to the commission to promote effective outreach, including metrics for use in evaluating success.

(2) This subdivision shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2020, and shall have no force or effect on or after that date, unless a later enacted statute that is chaptered before January 1, 2020, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 7.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rehearings [1731. - 1736.]

1731.

(a) The commission shall set an effective date when issuing an order or decision. The commission may set the effective date of an order or decision before the date of issuance of the order or decision.

(b) (1) After an order or decision has been made by the commission, a party to the action or proceeding, or a stockholder, bondholder, or other party pecuniarily interested in the public utility affected, may apply for a rehearing in respect to matters determined in the action or proceeding and specified in the application for rehearing. The commission may grant and hold a rehearing on those matters, if in its judgment sufficient reason is made to appear. A cause
 of action arising out of any order or decision of the commission shall not accrue in any court to any corporation or person unless the corporation or person has filed an application to the commission for a rehearing within 30 days after the date of issuance or within 10 days after the date of issuance in the case of an order issued pursuant to either Article 5 (commencing with Section 816) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 851) of Chapter 4 relating to security transactions and the transfer or encumbrance of utility property.

(2) The commission shall notify the parties of the issuance of an order or decision by either mail or electronic transmission. Notification of the parties may be accomplished by one of the following methods:

(A) Mailing the order or decision to the
 parties to the action or proceeding.

(B) If a party to an action or proceeding consents in advance to receive notice of any order or decision related to the action or proceeding by electronic mail address, notification of the party may be accomplished by transmitting an electronic copy of the official version of the order or decision to the party if the party has provided an electronic mail address to the commission.

(C) If a party to an action or proceeding consents in advance to receive notice of any order or decision related to the action or proceeding by electronic mail address, notification of the party may be accomplished by transmitting a link to an internet website where the official version of the order or decision is readily available to the party if the party has
 provided an electronic mail address to the commission.

(3) For purposes of this article, “date of issuance” means the mailing or electronic transmission date that is stamped on the official version of the order or decision.

(c) A cause of action arising out of an order or decision of the commission construing, applying, or implementing Chapter 4 of the Statutes of the 2001–02 First Extraordinary Session that (1) relates to the determination or implementation of the department’s revenue requirements, or the establishment or implementation of bond or power charges necessary to recover those revenue requirements, or (2) in the sole determination of the Department of Water Resources, the expedited review of order or decision of the commission is necessary or desirable, for the
 maintenance of any credit ratings on any bonds or notes of the department issued pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code or for the department to meet its obligations with respect to any bonds or notes pursuant to that division, shall not accrue in any court to any corporation or person unless the corporation or person has filed an application with the commission for a rehearing within 10 days after the date of issuance of the order or decision. The Department of Water Resources shall notify the commission of any determination pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subdivision before the issuance by the commission of any order or decision construing, applying, or implementing Chapter 4 of the Statutes of the 2001–02 First Extraordinary Session. The commission shall issue its decision and order on rehearing within 210 days after the filing of the application.

(d) A cause of action arising out of an order or decision of the commission construing, applying, or implementing Article 5.7 (commencing with Section 849) or Article 5.8 (commencing with Section 850) of Chapter 4 shall not accrue in any court to any entity or person unless the entity or person has filed an application to the commission for a rehearing within 10 days after the date of issuance of the order or decision. The commission shall issue its decision and order on rehearing within 210 days after the filing of that application.

(e) A cause of action arising out of an executive director disposition of a protest to a General Order 131-D notice of proposed construction deemed exempt from the requirement to submit an application for a permit or certificate for an electrical transmission
 facility shall not accrue in any court to any entity or person unless the entity or person has filed an application to the commission for a rehearing within 10 days after the date of issuance of the disposition. The commission shall issue its decision and order on rehearing within 90 days after the filing of that application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 299, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1732.

The application for a rehearing shall set forth specifically the ground or grounds on which the applicant considers the decision or order to be unlawful. No corporation or person shall in any court urge or rely on any ground not so set forth in the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1733.

(a) Any application for a rehearing made 10 days or more before the effective date of the order as to which a rehearing is sought, shall be either granted or denied before the effective date, or the order shall stand suspended until the application is granted or denied; but, absent further order of the commission the order shall not stand so suspended for more than 60 days after the date of filing of the application, at which time the suspension shall lapse, the order shall become effective, and the application may be taken by the party making it to be denied.

(b) Any application for a rehearing made within less than 10 days before the effective date of the order as to which a rehearing is sought, and not granted within 60 days, may be taken by the party making the application to be denied, unless the effective date of the order is extended for the period of the pendency of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

1734.

If any application for a rehearing is granted without a suspension of the order involved, the commission shall forthwith proceed to hear the matter with all dispatch and shall determine the matter within 20 days after final submission. If no determination is made within that time, it may be taken by any party to the rehearing that the order involved is affirmed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.

An application for rehearing shall not excuse any corporation or person from complying with and obeying any order or decision, or any requirement of any order or decision of the commission theretofore made, or operate in any manner to stay or postpone the enforcement thereof, except in such cases and upon such terms as the commission by order directs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1736.

If, after such rehearing and a consideration of all the facts, including those arising since the making of the order or decision, the commission is of the opinion that the original order or decision or any part thereof is in any respect unjust or unwarranted, or should be changed, the commission may abrogate, change, or modify it. The order or decision abrogating, changing, or modifying the original order or decision shall have the same force and effect as an orginal order or decision, but shall not affect any right or the enforcement of any right arising from or by virtue of the original order or decision unless so ordered by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Judicial Review [1756. - 1770.]

1756.

(a) Within 30 days after the commission issues its decision denying the application for a rehearing, or, if the application was granted, then within 30 days after the commission issues its decision on rehearing, or at least 120 days after the application is granted if no decision on rehearing has been issued, any aggrieved party may petition for a writ of review in the court of appeal or the Supreme Court for the purpose of having the lawfulness of the original order or decision or of the order or decision on rehearing inquired into and determined. If the writ issues, it shall be made returnable at a time and place specified by court order and shall direct the commission to certify its record in the case to the court within the time specified.

(b) The petition for review shall be served upon the executive director and the general counsel of the commission either personally or by service at the office of the commission.

(c) For purposes of this section, the issuance of a decision or the granting of an application shall be construed to have occurred on the date of issuance, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1731.

(d) The venue of a petition filed in the court of appeal pursuant to this section shall be in the judicial district in which the petitioner resides. If the petitioner is a business, venue shall be in the judicial district in which the petitioner has its principal place of business in California.

(e) Any party may seek from the Supreme Court, pursuant to California Rules of Court, an order transferring related actions to a single appellate district.

(f) For purposes of this section, review of decisions pertaining solely to water corporations shall only be by petition for writ of review in the Supreme Court, except that review of complaint or enforcement proceedings may be in the court of appeal or the Supreme Court.

(g) No order or decision arising out of a commission proceeding under Section 854 shall be reviewable in the court of appeal pursuant to subdivision (a) if the application for commission authority to complete the merger or acquisition was filed on or before December 31, 1998, by two telecommunications-related corporations including at least one which provides local telecommunications service to over one million California customers. These orders or decisions shall be reviewed pursuant to the Public Utilities Code in existence on December 31, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 217, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.2.

In any proceeding reviewing an order or decision of the commission in the Supreme Court or court of appeal, the commission may appear and be heard as a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.

(a) No new or additional evidence shall be introduced upon review by the court. In a complaint or enforcement proceeding, or in a ratemaking or licensing decision of specific application that is addressed to particular parties, the review by the court shall not extend further than to determine, on the basis of the entire record which shall be certified by the commission, whether any of the following occurred:

(1) The commission acted without, or in excess of, its powers or jurisdiction.

(2) The commission has not proceeded in the manner required by law.

(3) The decision of the commission is not supported by the findings.

(4) The findings in the decision of the commission are not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(5) The order or decision of the commission was procured by fraud or was an abuse of discretion.

(6) The order or decision of the commission violates any right of the petitioner under the Constitution of the United States or the California Constitution.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the court to hold a trial de novo, to take evidence other than as specified by the California Rules of Court, or to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the standard of review in this section shall not apply to ratemaking or licensing decisions of specific application addressed solely to water corporations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 953, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.1.

(a) In any proceeding other than a proceeding subject to the standard of review under Section 1757, review by the court shall not extend further than to determine, on the basis of the entire record which shall be certified by the commission, whether any of the following occurred:

(1) The order or decision of the commission was an abuse of discretion.

(2) The commission has not proceeded in the manner required by law.

(3) The commission acted without, or in excess of, its powers or jurisdiction.

(4) The decision of the commission is not supported by the findings.

(5) The order or decision was procured by fraud.

(6) The order or decision of the commission violates any right of the petitioner under the Constitution of the United States or the California Constitution.

(b) In reviewing decisions pertaining solely to water corporations, the review shall not be extended further than to determine whether the commission has regularly pursued its authority, including a determination whether the order or decision under review violates any right of the petitioner under the Constitution of the United States or this state.

(c) No new or additional evidence shall be introduced upon review by the court. The findings and conclusions of the commission on findings of fact shall be final and shall not be subject to review except as provided in this article. The questions of fact shall include ultimate facts and findings and conclusions of the commission on reasonableness and discrimination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 953, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.

(a) The commission and each party to the action or proceeding before the commission may appear in the review proceeding.

Upon the hearing the Supreme Court or court of appeal shall enter judgment either affirming or setting aside the order or decision of the commission.
